Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.090

Rules and regulations.

The commission shall promulgate, revise or rescind such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary or appropriate to administer the provisions of this chapter in conformity with the intent and purpose of this chapter and consistent with the best standards of labor-management relations.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 20; 1967 ex.s. c 108 s 9.]

NOTES: